Illinois, session 104th, HB1790.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 246 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)7    Sec. 246. Firearm safety device tax credit. 8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Eligible transaction" means a transaction in which a 10taxpayer purchases one or more firearm safety devices from a 11dealer that is federally licensed pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 923.12    "Firearm" means any handgun, shotgun, rifle, or other 13firearm that will, is designed to, or may be readily converted 14to expel single or multiple projectiles by action of an 15explosion of a combustible material.16    "Firearm safety device" means a safe, gun safe, gun case, 17lock box, or other device that is designed to be or can be used 18to store a firearm and that is designed to be unlocked only by 19means of a key, a combination, or other similar means.20    (b) For taxable years that begin on and after January 1, 212026 and begin before January 1, 2031, a taxpayer who 22purchases one or more firearm safety devices in an eligible 23transaction during the taxable year may apply to the   HB1790- 2 -LRB104 09961 HLH 20031 b1Department for a nonrefundable credit against the tax imposed 2by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201. The credit shall be 3in the amount of the cost incurred by the taxpayer for the 4purchase of the firearm safety device but not to exceed $300 5per taxpayer in any taxable year. A taxpayer shall be allowed 6only one credit under this Section per taxable year. The 7taxpayer shall apply to the Department in the form and manner 8required by the Department. The aggregate amount of credits 9allowable under this Section shall not exceed $5,000,000 in 10any taxable year. Credits shall be allocated by the Department 11on a first-come, first-served basis.12    (c) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce 13the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 14the credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess 15may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 165 taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax 17credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is 18a tax liability. If there are credits for more than one year 19that are available to offset a liability, the earlier credit 20shall be applied first.21    (d) The Department shall adopt rules for the 22administration and implementation of the credit under this 23Section. 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.